src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
LEXICON RITJAS !  Like GÁMAS but without stem a-lengthening for grade I (underlying long -i-). presently only for "ritjas".

* ritjas # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *ritjas:* `ritjas+N+Sg+Nom`
* *rihtjasis:* `ritjas+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON SÅGAS   gen: sågaska. Presently only for "sågas".

* sågas # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sågas:* `sågas+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sågaskav:* `sågas+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON SJUVÁJ   Presently only for "sjuváj". sjuváj-sjuvvaga. Only this word

* sjuváj # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sjuváj:* `sjuváj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sjuvvagis:* `sjuváj+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BØSOJ  Because of bösoj in O.Korhonen, and bæsoj-bessuga. Only for these two words. J becomes g.

LEXICON GUOVSOJVUOJOJ  vuojoj:vuodjom. Presently only for "guovsojvuojoj".

* guovsojvuojoj # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *guovsojvuojoj:* `guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *guovsojvuodjomav:* `guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON BUTJES   butjes-buttjása. Presently only for "butjes". This is an sub. Korhonen has this form but if you look in Grundstöm it's buttjes-budtjasa. Must be a typo in Korhonen, because ttj-tj dosn't exist in smj. This form is err subed in stems file.

LEXICON TJÅLKES  tjålkes:tjoalkkas- Presently only for "tjålkes and tsålkes". This must be wrong, and it dosn't exist in Grundström. Å in 1. syll isn't possible with e in 2. syll. Must be tjoalkes-tjoalkkása or tjålkas-tjoalkkasa. This form is err subed in stems file.

* tsålkes # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* ★*tsålkes:* `tsålkes+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)
* ★*tsoalkkasav:* `tsålkes+N+Sg+Acc` (is not standard language)

LEXICON VÁJES   vájes:vádjas- Presently only for "báhkovájes". It's a sub: 2. syll e doesn't become a. Must be vájes-vádjása or vájas-vádjasa. The second is used in NT, so I belive thats the right one. This form is err subed in stems file.

Derived stems

LEXICON BADJEL  Derived nouns with acc -elav, ill -elij, elat -elas, etc. These were previously categorized as adpositions and adverbs, but according to Bruce Morén-Duolljá (2014) they are actually case forms of nouns derived from certain location nouns. Derived from even strong stems (badje -> badjel). Odd syllable inflection, but only singular nominative-elative (not clear if they take comitative and essive case). With comparatives. No Px.

* allel # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *allel:* `allel+N+Sg+Nom`
* *allelis:* `allel+N+Sg+Ela`
* *allelabbo:* `allel+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON BÁRNEP  bárnep:bárnebu-. Comparisation of nouns. No -ahtá abesive.

* iednep # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *iednep:* `iednep+N+Sg+Nom`
* *iednebuv:* `iednep+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON OAPPÁSJ   Like GAHPER, but for derived nouns in diminutive, have an underived form. Doesn't get abesive -ahtá or -ahtes derivation. Oddsyll, no cg, no vowchange, no short Ess. Has only one dimin derivation since these words already are dimin, ie. not double dim as in GAHPER.

* stiebil # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *oappásj:* `oappásj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *oappátjis:* `oappásj+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON FIERUN   Like GAHPER, but instruments derived from verbs. Fierrot>fierun. No short essive.

* stiebil # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *fierun:* `fierun+N+Sg+Nom`
* *fierunis:* `fierun+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON GUOLLÁR  Like GAHPER, but actor derived from contracted verbs (ACTOR for evensyll verbs). Guollit>guollár. No short essive.   

LEXICON IELLEM  Nomen actionionis derived from even verbs. Earlier these went directly to VSBST-ODD, now they get tag Gram/NomAct before going there. Can't put it in VSBST-ODD lexicon because paths from verb lexicons.  

LEXICON TJIEKTJAMA  Pl Nomen actionionis derived from even verbs. Earlier these went directly to VSBST-ODD-PL, now they get tag Gram/NomAct before going there. Can't put it in VSBST-ODD-PL lexicon because of paths from verb lexicons.  

LEXICON AKTIDIBME  Nomen actionionis derived from uneven verbs, ending DIBME. Earlier these went directly to VSBST-EVEN, now they get tag Gram/NomAct before going there. Can't put it in VSBST-ODD lexicon because paths from verb lexicons.  

LEXICON BERUSTIBME  Nomen actionionis derived from uneven verbs, ending STIBME and DIBME is Err/orth-taged. Earlier these went directly to VSBST-EVEN, now they get tag Gram/NomAct before going there. Can't put it in VSBST-ODD lexicon because paths from verb lexicons.  

### Plural odd-syll

LEXICON DÁRBBAGA  Like BENA, but plural. Presently only for "dárbbaga", has singular stem counterpart.

* dárbbaga # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *dárbbaga:* `dárbbaga+N+Pl+Nom`
* *dárbbagijt:* `dárbbaga+N+Pl+Acc`

LEXICON BÆLLJASA  Like GÁMAS, but plural. These have corresponding singular stems.

* jiednabælljasa # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *jiednabælljasa:* `jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Nom`
* *jiednabälljasa:* `jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Nom`
* *jiednabælljasijt:* `jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Acc`
* *jiednabälljasijt:* `jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Acc`

LEXICON IEDNITJA  Odd syllable pluralforms only. These do not have a singular form.

* jáhkoguojmitja # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *jáhkoguojmitja:* `jáhkoguojmitja+N+Pl+Nom`
* *jáhkoguojmitjijt:* `jáhkoguojmitja+N+Pl+Acc`

LEXICON SNJIERÁGA  Odd syllable pluralforms only. These have corresponding singular stems.

* guovlloådåsa # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *guovlloådåsa:* `guovlloådåsa+N+Pl+Nom`
* *guovlloådåsijt:* `guovlloådåsa+N+Pl+Acc`

LEXICON MANEBU  oddsyllable plural only. presently only for "maŋebu".

* maŋebu # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *maŋebu:* `maŋebu+N+Pl+Nom`
* *maŋebujt:* `maŋebu+N+Pl+Acc`

## Contracted stems

LEXICON SUOLOJ  C-final with cg II-III: ålmåj:ålmmå

* njurgoj # Contracted test examples:*
* *njurgoj:* `njurgoj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *njurgguv:* `njurgoj+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON ÅLMÅJ_LOAN  Same as SUOLOJ, only for loan words. Follows Ráhka/Mikkelsen's Bårjås 2014. C-final with cg II-III: ålmåj:ålmmå

* bistroj # Contracted test examples:*
* *bistroj:* `bistroj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *bisstruv:* `bistroj+N+Sg+Acc`
* *bisstruhav:* `bistroj+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON GUOMOJ  C-final with cg I-III: guomoj:guobbmu

* ænoj # Contracted test examples:*
* *ænoj:* `ænoj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *æddnuv:* `ænoj+N+Sg+Acc`
* *änoj:* `ænoj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *äddnuv:* `ænoj+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON SARVES  C-final with cg II-III. sarves:sarvvá

* moarmes # Contracted test examples:*
* *moarmes:* `moarmes+N+Sg+Nom`
* *moarmmáv:* `moarmes+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON SVÁLES  C-final with cg I-III. sváles:svállá (lºl)

* sváles # Contracted test examples:*
* *sváles:* `sváles+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sválláv:* `sváles+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON GÅHKES  C-final with cg II-III with vowel harmony (a/á=å). gåhkes:gåhkkå. Presently only for "gåhkes".

* gåhkes # Contracted test examples:*
* *gåhkes:* `gåhkes+N+Sg+Nom`
* *gåhkkåv:* `gåhkes+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON SJUOKKAJ  sjuokkaj:sjuoggá. Presently only for "sjuokkaj".

* sjuokkaj # Contracted test examples:*
* *sjuokkaj:* `sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sjuoggáv:* `sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON GISTÁ  gistá:gisstá. Presently only for "gistá".

* gistá # Contracted test examples:*
* *gistá:* `gistá+N+Sg+Nom`
* *gisstáv:* `gistá+N+Sg+Acc`

###  Contracted stems sublexica

## Px lexica

LEXICON DUOLMUN   Fierrot>fierun, instruments derived from verbs, used only for verb derivation, not for lexicalized lemmas. No short essive.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
